Illinois, session 104th, SB1177.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Court of Claims Act is amended by changing 5Sections 2, 4, 6, 9, 13, 21, and 22 as follows: 6    (705 ILCS 505/2)  (from Ch. 37, par. 439.2)7    Sec. 2. Terms and Appointment of Successor Judges. Judges 8appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the 9Senate under Section 1 of this Act shall hold office for a term 10of 6 years and until their successors are appointed and 11qualified. Upon the expiration of the terms of office of the 12incumbent judges the Governor shall appoint their successors 13by and with the consent of the Senate for terms of 2, 4 and 6 14years commencing on the third Monday in January of the year 151953. Of the 2 new members first appointed after the effective 16date of this amendatory Act of 1983, one shall be appointed to 17an initial term ending the third Monday in January, 1986, and 18one shall be appointed to an initial term ending on the third 19Monday in January, 1988. Of the 2 members first appointed 20after the effective date of this amendatory Act of 1986, one 21shall be appointed to an initial term ending the third Monday 22in January, 1989, and one shall be appointed to an initial term 23ending on the third Monday in January, 1991. After the   SB1177- 2 -LRB104 06299 JRC 16334 b1expiration of the terms of the judges first appointed, each of 2their respective successors shall hold office for a term of 6 3years and until their successors are appointed and qualified.4(Source: P.A. 84-1240.) 5    (705 ILCS 505/4)  (from Ch. 37, par. 439.4)6    Sec. 4. Each judge shall receive an annual salary of: Each 7judge shall receive an annual salary as set by the 8Compensation Review Board. $20,900 from the third Monday in 9January, 1979 to the third Monday in January, 1980; $22,100 10from the third Monday in January, 1980 to the third Monday in 11January, 1981; $23,400 from the third Monday in January, 1981 12to the third Monday in January, 1982, and $25,000 thereafter, 13or as set by the Compensation Review Board, whichever is 14greater, payable in equal monthly installments.15(Source: P.A. 83-1177.) 16    (705 ILCS 505/6)  (from Ch. 37, par. 439.6)17    Sec. 6. The court shall hold sessions at such places or 18remotely as it deems necessary to expedite the business of the 19court.20(Source: P.A. 90-492, eff. 8-17-97.) 21    (705 ILCS 505/9)  (from Ch. 37, par. 439.9)22    Sec. 9. The court may: A. Establish rules for its 23government and for the regulation of practice therein; appoint   SB1177- 3 -LRB104 06299 JRC 16334 b1commissioners to assist the court in such manner as it directs 2and discharge them at will; and exercise such powers as are 3necessary to carry into effect the powers granted in this 4Section. Any Commissioner appointed shall be an attorney 5licensed to practice law in the State of Illinois. The rules 6established hereunder shall not be waived, and any extension 7of time authorized by such rules shall only be allowed on 8motion duly filed within the time limitation for which the 9extension is requested.10    B. Issue subpoenas through the Chief Justice or one of its 11judges or commissioners to require the attendance of witnesses 12for the purpose of testifying before it, or before any judge of 13the court, or before any notary public, or any of its 14commissioners, and to require the production of any books, 15records, papers or documents that may be material or relevant 16as evidence in any matter pending before it. In case any person 17refuses to comply with any subpoena issued in the name of the 18chief justice, or one of the judges or commissioners, attested 19by the clerk, with the seal of the court attached, and served 20upon the person named therein as a summons in a civil action is 21served, the circuit court of the proper county, on application 22of the party at whose instance the subpoena was issued, shall 23compel obedience by attachment proceedings, as for contempt, 24as in a case of a disobedience of the requirements of a 25subpoena from such court on a refusal to testify therein.26    C. The court may adopt administrative rules to provide for   SB1177- 4 -LRB104 06299 JRC 16334 b1remote or electronic filing of a claim or other motion, 2participation in any capacity before the court, taking of 3evidence or testimony, conducting any business of the court, 4or payment of any fees to the court. 5(Source: P.A. 83-865.) 6    (705 ILCS 505/13)  (from Ch. 37, par. 439.13)7    Sec. 13. Any judge or commissioner of the court may sit at 8any place within the State or may remotely to take evidence in 9or conduct any case in the court.10(Source: Laws 1945, p. 660.) 11    (705 ILCS 505/21)  (from Ch. 37, par. 439.21)12    Sec. 21. The court is authorized to impose, by uniform 13rules, a fee of $15 for the filing of a petition in any case in 14which the award sought is more than $50 and less than $1,000 15and $35 in any case in which the award sought is $1,000 or 16more; and to charge and collect for copies of opinions or other 17documents filed in the Court of Claims such fees as may be 18prescribed by the rules of the Court. All fees and charges so 19collected shall be forthwith paid into the State Treasury. The 20Court may determine the form and manner of all filing fees and 21other charges due the court by administrative rule. 22    A petitioner who is a prisoner in an Illinois Department 23of Corrections facility who files a pleading, motion, or other 24filing that purports to be a legal document against the State,   SB1177- 5 -LRB104 06299 JRC 16334 b1the Illinois Department of Corrections, the Prisoner Review 2Board, or any of their officers or employees in which the court 3makes a specific finding that it is frivolous shall pay all 4filing fees and court costs in the manner provided in Article 5XXII of the Code of Civil Procedure.6    In claims based upon lapsed appropriations or lost warrant 7or in claims filed under the Line of Duty Compensation Act, the 8Illinois National Guardsman's Compensation Act, or the Crime 9Victims Compensation Act or in claims filed by medical vendors 10for medical services rendered by the claimant to persons 11eligible for Medical Assistance under programs administered by 12the Department of Healthcare and Family Services, no filing 13fee shall be required.14(Source: P.A. 95-331, eff. 8-21-07.) 15    (705 ILCS 505/22)  (from Ch. 37, par. 439.22)16    Sec. 22. Every claim cognizable by the court and not 17otherwise sooner barred by law shall be forever barred from 18prosecution therein unless it is filed with the clerk of the 19court within the time set forth as follows: 20        (a) All claims arising out of a contract must be filed 21    within 5 years after it first accrues, saving to minors, 22    and persons under legal disability at the time the claim 23    accrues, in which cases the claim must be filed within 5 24    years from the time the disability ceases. 25        (b) All claims cognizable against the State by vendors   SB1177- 6 -LRB104 06299 JRC 16334 b1    of goods or services under the Illinois Public Aid Code 2    must be filed within one year after the accrual of the 3    cause of action, as provided in Section 11-13 of that 4    Code. 5        (c) All claims arising under paragraph (c) of Section 6    8 of this Act must be automatically heard by the court 7    within 120 days after the person asserting such claim is 8    either issued a certificate of innocence from the circuit 9    court as provided in Section 2-702 of the Code of Civil 10    Procedure, or is granted a pardon by the Governor, 11    whichever occurs later, without the person asserting the 12    claim being required to file a petition under Section 11 13    of this Act, except as otherwise provided by the Crime 14    Victims Compensation Act. Any claims filed by the claimant 15    under paragraph (c) of Section 8 of this Act must be filed 16    within 2 years after the person asserting such claim is 17    either issued a certificate of innocence as provided in 18    Section 2-702 of the Code of Civil Procedure, or is 19    granted a pardon by the Governor, whichever occurs later.20        (d) All claims arising under paragraph (f) of Section 21    8 of this Act must be filed within the time set forth in 22    Section 3 of the Line of Duty Compensation Act. 23        (e) All claims arising under paragraph (h) of Section 24    8 of this Act must be filed within one year of the date of 25    the death of the guardsman or militiaman as provided in 26    Section 3 of the Illinois National Guardsman's   SB1177- 7 -LRB104 06299 JRC 16334 b1    Compensation Act. 2        (f) All claims arising under paragraph (g) of Section 3    8 of this Act must be filed within 5 years one year of the 4    crime on which a claim is based as provided in Section 6.1 5    of the Crime Victims Compensation Act. 6        (g) All claims arising from the Comptroller's refusal 7    to issue a replacement warrant pursuant to Section 10.10 8    of the State Comptroller Act must be filed within 5 years 9    after the date of the Comptroller's refusal. 10        (h) All other claims must be filed within 2 years 11    after it first accrues, saving to minors, and persons 12    under legal disability at the time the claim accrues, in 13    which case the claim must be filed within 2 years from the 14    time the disability ceases. 15        (i) The changes made by Public Act 86-458 apply to all 16    warrants issued within the 5-year period preceding August 17    31, 1989 (the effective date of Public Act 86-458). The 18    changes made to this Section by Public Act 100-1124 apply 19    to claims pending on November 27, 2018 (the effective date 20    of Public Act 100-1124) and to claims filed thereafter.21        (j) All time limitations established under this Act 22    and the rules promulgated under this Act shall be binding 23    and jurisdictional, except upon extension authorized by 24    law or rule and granted pursuant to a motion timely filed. 25(Source: P.A. 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22.)